Utah statutes.
53B-2a-114.   Educational program on the use of information technology.

(1)  The Utah College of Applied Technology shall offer an educational program on the use of information technology as provided in this section.

(2)  An educational program on the use of information technology shall:

(a)  provide instruction on skills and competencies essential for the workplace and requested by employers;

(b)  include the following components:

(i)  a curriculum;

(ii)  online access to the curriculum;

(iii)  instructional software for classroom and student use;

(iv)  certification of skills and competencies most frequently requested by employers;

(v)  professional development for faculty; and

(vi)  deployment and program support, including integration with existing curriculum standards; and

(c)  be made available to students, faculty, and staff of the Utah College of Applied Technology.

